Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Disease Control Measures.
§ 32.1-46.01.
Virginia Immunization Information System.

The Board of Health shall establish the Virginia Immunization Information System (VIIS), a statewide immunization registry that consolidates patient immunization histories from birth to death into a complete, accurate, and definitive record that may be made available to participating health care providers throughout Virginia, to the extent funds are appropriated by the General Assembly or otherwise made available. The purposes of VIIS shall be to (i) protect the public health of all citizens of the Commonwealth, (ii) prevent under-immunization and over-immunization of children, (iii) ensure up-to-date recommendations for immunization scheduling to health care providers and the Board, (iv) generate parental reminder and recall notices and manufacturer recalls, (v) develop immunization coverage reports, (vi) identify areas of under-immunized population, and (vii) provide, in the event of a public health emergency, a mechanism for tracking the distribution and administration of immunizations, immune globulins, or other preventive medications or emergency treatments. Any health care provider, as defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

, in the Commonwealth that administers immunizations shall report such patient immunization information to VIIS pursuant to this section.

The Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the VIIS that shall address:

Registration of participants, including, but not limited to, a list of those health care entities that are authorized and required to participate and any forms and agreements necessary for compliance with the regulations concerning patient privacy promulgated by the federal Department of Health and Human Services;

Procedures for confirming, continuing, and terminating participation and disciplining any participant for unauthorized use or disclosure of any VIIS data;

Procedures, timelines, and formats for reporting of immunizations by participants;

Procedures to provide for a secure system of data entry that may include encrypted online data entry or secure delivery of data files;

Procedures for incorporating the data reported on children’s immunizations pursuant to subsection E of §

32.1-46

;

The patient identifying data to be reported, including, but not limited to, the patient’s name, date of birth, gender, telephone number, home address, birth place, and mother’s maiden name;

The patient immunization information to be reported, including, but not necessarily limited to, the type of immunization administered (specified by current procedural terminology (CPT) code or Health Level 7 (HL7) code); date of administration; identity of administering person; lot number; and if present, any contraindications, or religious or medical exemptions;

Mechanisms for entering into data-sharing agreements with other state and regional immunization registries for the exchange, on a periodic nonemergency basis and in the event of a public health emergency, of patient immunization information, after receiving, in writing, satisfactory assurances for the preservation of confidentiality, a clear description of the data requested, specific details on the intended use of the data, and the identities of the persons with whom the data will be shared;

Procedures for the use of vital statistics data, including, but not necessarily limited to, the linking of birth certificates and death certificates;

Procedures for requesting immunization records that are in compliance with the requirements for disclosing health records set forth in §

32.1-127.1:03

; such procedures shall address the approved uses for the requested data, to whom the data may be disclosed, and information on the provisions for disclosure of health records pursuant to §

32.1-127.1:03

;

Procedures for releasing aggregate data, from which personal identifying data has been removed or redacted, to qualified persons for purposes of research, statistical analysis, and reporting; and

Procedures for the Commissioner of Health to access and release, as necessary, the data contained in VIIS in the event of an epidemic or an outbreak of any vaccine-preventable disease or the potential epidemic or epidemic of any disease of public health importance, public health significance, or public health threat for which a treatment or vaccine exists.The Board’s regulations shall also include any necessary definitions for the operation of VIIS; however, “health care entity,” “health care plan,” and “health care provider” shall be as defined in subsection B of § 32.1-127.1:03.

The establishment and implementation of VIIS is hereby declared to be a necessary public health activity to ensure the integrity of the health care system in Virginia and to prevent serious harm and serious threats to the health and safety of individuals and the public. Pursuant to the regulations concerning patient privacy promulgated by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, covered entities may disclose protected health information to the secure system established for VIIS without obtaining consent or authorization for such disclosure. Such protected health information shall be used exclusively for the purposes established in this section.

The Board and Commissioner of Health, any employees of the health department, any participant, and any person authorized to report or disclose immunization data hereunder shall be immune from civil liability in connection therewith unless such person acted with gross negligence or malicious intent.

This section shall not diminish the responsibility of any physician or other person to maintain accurate patient immunization data or the responsibility of any parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to cause a child to be immunized in accordance with the provisions of §

32.1-46

. Further, this section shall not be construed to require the immunization of any person who objects thereto on the grounds that the administration of immunizing agents conflicts with his religious tenets or practices, or any person for whom administration of immunizing agents would be detrimental to his health.

The Commissioner may authorize linkages between VIIS and other secure electronic databases that contain health records reported to the Department of Health, subject to all state and federal privacy laws and regulations. These health records may include newborn screening results reported pursuant to §

32.1-65

, newborn hearing screening results reported pursuant to §

32.1-64.1

, and blood-lead level screening results reported pursuant to §

32.1-46.1

. Health care providers authorized to use VIIS may view the health records of individuals to whom the providers are providing health care services.

History.

2005, cc. 643, 684; 2012, c. 147; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 211.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, cc. 1 and
2, effective February 15, 2021, cl. 1 provides:

“§ 1. As used in this act, “eligible health care provider” means any of the following who, due to their education and training, are authorized to administer drugs: (i) any person licensed by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions whose license is in good standing, or was in good standing within the 20 years immediately prior to lapsing; (ii) any emergency medical services provider licensed or certified by the Department of Health (the Department) whose license or certification is in good standing, or was in good standing within the 20 years immediately prior to lapsing; and (iii) any health professions student enrolled in an accredited program in the Commonwealth who is in good academic standing with such student’s school and provided that the school certifies that the student has been properly trained in the administration of vaccines. Eligible health care providers may also be employees of localities, pharmacies, or hospitals. Localities, pharmacies, or hospitals that offer their employees to support vaccination clinics shall (i) verify employee certification or licensure, (ii) document completion of the required training, and (iii) provide a list of qualified and available vaccinators to the Department.

“§ 2. During a state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic declared by the Governor pursuant to
§

44-146.17

of the Code of Virginia, an eligible health care provider participating in the program established pursuant to § 3 of this act may administer the COVID-19 vaccine to citizens of the Commonwealth, in accordance with this act.

“§ 3. The Department shall establish a program to enable eligible health care providers to volunteer to administer the COVID-19 vaccine to residents of the Commonwealth during a state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic declared by the Governor pursuant to
§

44-146.17

of the Code of Virginia. Such program shall include (i) a process by which an eligible health care provider may register to participate in the program and (ii) the training requirements for participating eligible health care providers related to the administration of the COVID-19 vaccine, including training on the intramuscular injection of the COVID-19 vaccine and contraindications and side effects of the COVID-19 vaccine. For the purposes of such program, requirements related to background investigation, training, and orientation for Medical Reserve Corps volunteers shall be waived. To facilitate volunteering, the Department shall place a volunteer link on its website’s home page in the same visible location as the other links, such as ‘GET COVIDWISE,’ to make the process to volunteer as a health care provider easily accessible.

“The Department shall make a list of eligible health care providers who have registered pursuant to this section of the act and complied with requirements for training established by the Department available to each local health department and to hospitals operating community vaccination clinics, and the Department, a local health department, or a hospital operating a community vaccination clinic may request that an eligible health care provider included on such list administer the COVID-19 vaccine at a vaccination clinic operated by or in partnership with the Department, local health department, or hospital. Information included on the list shall not be used for any other purpose and shall not be used after the expiration or revocation of all states of emergency declared by the Governor related to the COVID-19 pandemic.

“§ 4. The Department shall ensure that each site at which COVID-19 vaccinations are provided by eligible health care providers who provide such vaccination in accordance with this act meet the following requirements:

“1. A sufficient number of eligible health care providers whose scope of practice includes administration of vaccines shall be available at each site at which COVID-19 vaccines are administered by eligible health care providers pursuant to this act to ensure appropriate oversight of administration of vaccines by eligible health care providers whose scope of practice does not include administration of vaccines.

“2. A sufficient number of eligible health care providers or other persons who are certified to administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) are available at each site at which COVID-19 vaccines are administered by eligible health care providers pursuant to this act; however, a valid certification to perform CPR shall not be required to administer COVID-19 in accordance with this act.

“3. Any person who administers a COVID-19 vaccination in accordance with this act shall collect data, including data related to the race and ethnicity of the person to whom the vaccine is administered, and the person who administers a COVID-19 vaccination or the entity that operates a community vaccination site in accordance with this act shall report such data to the Virginia Immunization Information System established pursuant to
§

32.1-46.01

of the Code of Virginia.

“§ 5. A person who is licensed as a nurse practitioner by the Boards of Medicine and Nursing or licensed as a physician assistant by the Board of Medicine who administers the COVID-19 vaccine pursuant to this act may administer such vaccine without a written or electronic practice agreement.

“A health professions student who administers the COVID-19 vaccine pursuant to this act shall be supervised by any eligible health care provider who holds a license issued by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions, and the supervising health care provider shall not be required to be licensed in the same health profession for which the student is studying.

“§ 6. An eligible health care provider who is a health professions student shall, as part of the registration process established by the Department, provide such information necessary to demonstrate that he is in good academic standing with the accredited program in which he is enrolled and that he has been properly trained in the administration of vaccines as may be required by the Department. Information about a health professions student shall not be disclosed by the institution of higher education at which the health professions student is studying unless the health professions student has consented to such disclosure in accordance with the provisions of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974,
20 U.S.C. § 1232g and
§

23.1-405

of the Code of Virginia, as applicable.

“Clinical vaccination experience undertaken by a health professions student pursuant to this act may count toward meeting clinical hour requirements of the educational program in which the student is enrolled, subject to a requirement for written verification of such clinical vaccine experience.

“§ 7. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, any eligible health care provider or entity overseeing any eligible health care provider who administers the COVID-19 vaccine pursuant to this act shall not be liable for (i) any actual or alleged injury or wrongful death or (ii) any civil cause of action arising from any act or omission arising out of, related to, or alleged to have resulted in the contraction of or exposure to the COVID-19 virus or to have resulted from the administration of the COVID-19 vaccine.”

Acts
2021, cc. 1 and
2, effective February 15, 2021, cl. 2 provides:

“§ 1. That the Department of Health (the Department) shall establish a process by which entities, including medical care facilities, hospitals, hospital systems, corporations, businesses, pharmacies, public and private institutions of higher education, localities, and any other professional or community entity operating in the Commonwealth, may volunteer their facilities as sites at which the COVID-19 vaccine may be administered to citizens of the Commonwealth. The Department shall include on its website a link to information regarding such process and an online form that may be used by such entities to register their facilities to serve as sites at which the COVID-19 vaccine may be administered. The Commissioner of Health shall approve such sites in collaboration with local departments of health. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, any entity that volunteers its facility as a site at which the COVID-19 vaccine may be administered pursuant to this act and at which the COVID-19 vaccine is lawfully administered shall not be liable for (i) any actual or alleged injury or wrongful death or (ii) any civil cause of action arising from any act or omission arising out of, related to, or alleged to have resulted in the contraction of or exposure to the COVID-19 virus or to have resulted from the administration of the COVID-19 vaccine.”

Acts
2021, cc. 1 and
2, effective February 15, 2021, cl. 3 provides:

“§ 1. That a public institution of higher education or a private institution of higher education in the Commonwealth may volunteer to provide assistance to the Department of Health and local health departments for data processing, analytics, and program development related to the COVID-19 vaccine through the use of its employees, students, technology, and facilities. Such assistance may include collecting and organizing data on the administration of the COVID-19 vaccine and locations where the vaccine is being administered and performing other nonclinical staffing responsibilities. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, any institution or individual affiliated with an institution acting pursuant to this act shall not be liable for any civil or criminal penalties.”

Acts
2021, cc. 1 and
2, effective February 15, 2021, cl. 4 provides:

“§ 1. That localities with fire departments, emergency medical services departments, and volunteer rescue squads may establish and staff vaccine administration clinics for the purpose of administering COVID-19 vaccines. Vaccines shall be administered at such clinics only by EMTs, paramedics, licensed practical nurses, or registered nurses trained in the administration of vaccines and may be provided under the existing operating medical director (OMD) license for such local fire department or emergency medical services department. The Department of Health or hospitals serving the locality are authorized to provide vaccines to locality-created vaccine administration clinics upon the request of the locality, provided that such clinics meet the requirements under this act. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, any locality and OMD overseeing the administration of or EMT, paramedic, licensed practical nurse, or registered nurse who administers the COVID-19 vaccine pursuant to this act shall not be liable for (i) any actual or alleged injury or wrongful death or (ii) any civil cause of action arising from any act or omission arising out of, related to, or alleged to have resulted in the contraction of or exposure to the COVID-19 virus or to have resulted from the administration of the COVID-19 vaccine.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 211, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 147 added subsection F.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 211, effective January 1, 2022, in subsection A, substituted “under-immunization and” for “under- and” in clause (ii), and added the last sentence; in subdivision B 1, deleted “voluntary” following “Registration of” and inserted “and required”; and in subsection D, substituted “any participant” for “any voluntary participant.”

§ 32.1-46.02.
Administration of influenza vaccine to minors.

The Board shall, together with the Board of Nursing and by August 31, 2009, develop and issue guidelines for the administration of influenza vaccine to minors by licensed pharmacists, registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, or emergency medical services providers who hold an emergency medical technician intermediate or emergency medical technician paramedic certification issued by the Commissioner pursuant to § 54.1-3408. Such guidelines shall require the consent of the minor’s parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis and shall be consistent with applicable guidelines developed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

History.

2009, c. 110; 2010, cc. 179, 252; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by c. 179, effective March 29, 2010, and by c. 252, effective April 8, 2010, are identical, and inserted “certified emergency medical technicians-intermediate, or emergency medical techicians-paramedic” and made a related change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “or emergency medical services providers who hold an emergency medical technician intermediate or emergency medical technician paramedic certification issued by the Commissioner” for “certified emergency medical technicians intermediate, or emergency medical technicians-paramedic.”

§ 32.1-46.1.
Board to establish protocol for identification of children with elevated blood-lead levels.

The Board shall promulgate regulations establishing a protocol for the identification of children at risk for elevated blood-lead levels which shall (i) require blood-lead level testing at appropriate ages and frequencies, when indicated, (ii) provide for criteria for determining low risk for elevated blood-lead levels and when such blood-lead level testing is not indicated, and (iii) require physicians to make available to parents information on the dangers of lead poisoning, along with a list of available resources, as part of regular well check visits for all children.

As deemed necessary by the Board, the protocol may also address follow-up testing for children with elevated blood-lead levels, dissemination of the protocol or other information to relevant health care professionals, appropriate information for parents, and other means of preventing lead poisoning among children. In promulgating such regulations, the Board shall consider the guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and may consider such other materials relating to lead poisoning prevention, testing, and treatment as it deems appropriate. The Board may also establish procedures governing how health care providers and laboratories report results to the Department of Health.

The Commissioner may authorize linkages between secure electronic data systems maintained by the Department of Health containing blood-lead level records and the Virginia Immunization Information System (VIIS) operated pursuant to §

32.1-46.01

. The Commissioner may authorize health care providers authorized to view VIIS to view blood-lead level records of individuals to whom the providers are providing health care services. The records may be made available until the child reaches seven years of age, after which the records shall not be made available through a linkage to VIIS. Such linkages shall be subject to all applicable state and federal privacy laws and regulations.

History.

2000, c. 907; 2003, c. 463; 2007, c. 691; 2012, c. 147.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 463, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board and Department of Health shall not be responsible for enforcing any blood-lead level testing required by the regulations mandated in this provision; complaints relating to compliance by a practitioner with such regulations shall be directed to the appropriate health regulatory board and shall not be filed with the Board or the Department of Health.”

Acts 2003, c. 463, cl. 3 provides: “That, in order to avoid costs as much as possible during the regulatory process, the Board of Health shall, when in compliance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

, et seq.), notify, distribute, and provide public access and opportunity for comment via electronic media, including, but not limited to, posting documents to and receiving comments via the Department’s website, by email and fax. The Board shall, however, continue to provide public notice and participation to those persons who do not have access to the Internet or other forms of electronic media.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 463, in the first paragraph, substituted “(i) require” for “provide (i) for,” and inserted “provide” following “(ii)”; and substituted “or” for “and/or” following “protocol” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 691 added the provisions of (iii) to the end of the first paragraph and made related changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 147 added the last sentence in the next-to-last paragraph; and added the final paragraph.

§ 32.1-46.2.
Certain testing or determination of low risk for elevated blood-lead levels required.

In accordance with the protocol required by §

32.1-46.1

and the regulations of the Board of Health promulgated thereto, the parent, guardian or other person standing in loco parentis of each child within the Commonwealth shall cause such child to be tested for elevated blood-lead levels or shall obtain a determination that the child is at low risk for elevated blood-lead levels.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any child whose parent, guardian or other person having control or charge of such child shall object to such testing on the grounds that the procedure conflicts with his religious tenets or practices.

History.

2000, c. 907.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 907, cl. 3, provides: “That §

32.1-46.2

shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

§ 32.1-47.
Exclusion from school of children not immunized.

Upon the identification of an outbreak, potential epidemic or epidemic of a vaccine-preventable disease in a public or private school, the Commissioner shall have the authority to require the exclusion from such school of all children who are not immunized against that disease.

History.

1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-47.1.
Vaccination of children; plan enhancements.

The Department shall include in its vaccination plans procedures to ensure the prompt vaccination of all persons of school age in the Commonwealth, without preference regarding the manner of compliance with the compulsory school attendance law set forth in § 22.1-254, upon declaration of a public health emergency involving a vaccine-preventable disease and consent of the parent or guardian of the person of school age if such person is a minor or, if the person of school age is not a minor, of the person. Vaccination plans developed pursuant to this section shall be consistent with applicable guidelines developed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and shall be subject to the same review and update requirements, process, and schedule as the State Emergency Operations Plan developed by the Department of Emergency Management pursuant to § 44-146.18.

History.

2010, c. 73.

§ 32.1-48.
Powers of Commissioner in epidemic.

Nothing in this article shall preclude the Commissioner from requiring immediate immunization of all persons in case of an epidemic of any disease of public health importance for which a vaccine exists other than a person to whose health the administration of a vaccine would be detrimental as certified in writing by a physician licensed to practice medicine in this Commonwealth.

In addition, the State Health Commissioner shall hold the powers conferred pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of this chapter to issue orders of quarantine or prepare orders of isolation for a communicable disease of public health threat.

History.

1979, c. 711; 2004, cc. 773, 1021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and substituted “immunization” for “vaccination” in subsection A; and added subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Vaccine requirement. —

General Assembly could enact a statute requiring the COVID-19 vaccine for in-person school attendance as a valid exercise of the Commonwealth's police powers. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mark L. Keam, Member, House of Delegates, 21-030, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (4/26/21).

Virginia's public institutions of higher education, as specified in Title 23.1 of the Code of Virginia, may condition in-person attendance on receipt of an approved COVID-19 vaccine during this time of pandemic. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mark L. Keam, Member, House of Delegates, 21-030, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (4/26/21).

§ 32.1-48.001.
(For contingent effective date, see Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 472, cl. 2) Real-time information sharing for emergency medical services agencies.

The Department shall develop and implement a system for sharing information regarding confirmed cases of communicable diseases of public health threat with emergency medical services agencies in real time during a declared public health emergency related to a communicable disease of public health threat, in order to protect the health and safety of emergency medical services personnel and the public. Such system shall include information about the location of confirmed cases of the communicable disease of public health threat, including the address of such location; the number of confirmed and suspected cases of the communicable disease of public health threat at each such location; any measures implemented at such location to prevent exposing others to the communicable disease of public health threat; and any other information that the Department shall deem appropriate. Such system shall be updated in real time to reflect each confirmed case of the communicable disease of public health threat.

During a declared public health emergency related to a communicable disease of public health threat, every local and district health department in the Commonwealth shall report information regarding confirmed and suspected cases of the communicable disease of public health threat to the Department, in a format specified by the Board, for inclusion in the system developed pursuant to subsection A.

Information contained in the system developed pursuant to subsection A shall be made available to every emergency medical services agency in the Commonwealth and shall be used by such emergency medical services agencies for the purpose of (i) developing protocols to ensure the safety of emergency medical services personnel and the public when responding to calls for assistance at locations at which a case of the communicable disease of public health threat has been confirmed, including protocols related to appropriate staffing of the emergency medical services agency and the availability and use of appropriate equipment, including personal protective equipment, by emergency medical services personnel when responding to such calls, and (ii) during a declared public health emergency related to a communicable disease of public health threat, identifying specific locations at which a case of such communicable disease of public health threat has been confirmed for the purpose of implementing such protocols when responding to calls for assistance.

The Department shall make information submitted pursuant to subsection B and any other information contained in the system developed pursuant to subsection A available, upon request, to the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board and each regional emergency medical services council, for the purpose of monitoring and improving the quality of emergency medical services in the Commonwealth.

The Department shall regularly consult with the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board to identify the types of information that should be included in the system developed pursuant to subsection A and to revise reporting requirements for local and district health departments pursuant to subsection B.

Information contained in the system developed pursuant to subsection A shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except in accordance with this section.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 472.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 472, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (the CDC) approves a grant to the Commonwealth from the Epidemiology and Laboratory Capacity for Prevention and Control of Emerging Infectious Diseases (ELC) program that is sufficient to fund the costs of the Department of Health (the Department) to establish and implement the information-sharing system created by this act. The Department shall apply to the CDC for such funding and shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the outcome of its application.”